Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-902
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) Dealings with commercial entities that are organized under the laws of a foreign adversary or that have their principal place of business within a foreign adversary tend to be less commercially sound because such entities are unusually likely to be acting on noncommercial motivations and carry increased political risk, including from United States federal sanction authorities;

(2) When such a commercial entity is a state-owned entity, it presents heightened concerns and threatens this state's security, including by making accessible to the foreign adversary information about the structure, operations, resources, and infrastructure of the government of this state; and

(3) Dealings with such commercial entities, and especially state-owned entities, threaten the privacy and security of residents of this state, to the extent that they involve the personal information of such residents.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 8.